Illinois, session 104th, HB4926.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 510-22.24b and 34-18 and by adding Section 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.24b)7    Sec. 10-22.24b. School counseling services. School 8counseling services in public schools may be provided by 9school counselors as defined in Section 10-22.24a of this Code 10or by individuals who hold a Professional Educator License 11with a school support personnel endorsement in the area of 12school counseling under Section 21B-25 of this Code. School 13counseling services provided under this Section shall address 14the needs of all students, regardless of citizenship status. 15    School counseling services may include, but are not 16limited to:17        (1) designing and delivering a comprehensive school 18    counseling program through a standards-based, 19    data-informed program that promotes student achievement 20    and wellness;21        (2) (blank);22        (3) school counselors working as culturally skilled 23    professionals who act sensitively to promote social   HB4926- 2 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    justice and equity in a pluralistic society;2        (4) providing individual and group counseling;3        (5) providing a core counseling curriculum that serves 4    all students and addresses the knowledge and skills 5    appropriate to their developmental level through a 6    collaborative model of delivery involving the school 7    counselor, classroom teachers, and other appropriate 8    education professionals, and including prevention and 9    pre-referral activities;10        (6) making referrals when necessary to appropriate 11    offices or outside agencies;12        (7) providing college and career development 13    activities and counseling;14        (8) developing individual career plans with students, 15    which includes planning for post-secondary education, as 16    appropriate, and engaging in related and relevant career 17    and technical education coursework in high school;18        (9) assisting all students with a college or 19    post-secondary education plan, which must include a 20    discussion on all post-secondary education options, 21    including 4-year colleges or universities, community 22    colleges, and vocational schools, and includes planning 23    for post-secondary education, as appropriate, and engaging 24    in related and relevant career and technical education 25    coursework in high school;26        (10) (blank);  HB4926- 3 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1        (11) educating all students on scholarships, financial 2    aid, and preparation of the Federal Application for 3    Federal Student Aid;4        (12) collaborating with institutions of higher 5    education and local community colleges so that students 6    understand post-secondary education options and are ready 7    to transition successfully;8        (13) providing crisis intervention and contributing to 9    the development of a specific crisis plan within the 10    school setting in collaboration with multiple 11    stakeholders;12        (14) providing educational opportunities for students, 13    teachers, and parents on mental health issues;14        (15) providing counseling and other resources to 15    students who are in crisis;16        (16) working to address barriers that prohibit or 17    limit access to mental health services;18        (17) addressing bullying and conflict resolution with 19    all students;20        (18) teaching communication skills and helping 21    students develop positive relationships;22        (19) using culturally sensitive skills in working with 23    all students to promote wellness;24        (20) working to address the needs of all students with 25    regard to citizenship status;26        (21) (blank);  HB4926- 4 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1        (22) providing academic, social-emotional, and college 2    and career supports to all students irrespective of 3    special education or Section 504 status;4        (23) assisting students in goal setting and success 5    skills for classroom behavior, study skills, test 6    preparation, internal motivation, and intrinsic rewards;7        (24) (blank);8        (25) providing information for all students in the 9    selection of courses that will lead to post-secondary 10    education opportunities toward a successful career;11        (26) interpreting achievement test results and guiding 12    students in appropriate directions;13        (27) (blank);14        (28) providing families with opportunities for 15    education and counseling as appropriate in relation to the 16    student's educational assessment;17        (29) consulting and collaborating with teachers and 18    other school personnel regarding behavior management and 19    intervention plans and inclusion in support of students;20        (30) teaming and partnering with staff, parents, 21    businesses, and community organizations to support student 22    achievement and social-emotional learning standards for 23    all students;24        (31) developing and implementing school-based 25    prevention programs, including, but not limited to, 26    mediation and violence prevention, implementing social and   HB4926- 5 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    emotional education programs and services, and 2    establishing and implementing bullying prevention and 3    intervention programs;4        (32) developing culturally sensitive assessment 5    instruments for measuring school counseling prevention and 6    intervention effectiveness and collecting, analyzing, and 7    interpreting data;8        (33) participating on school and district committees 9    to advocate for student programs and resources, as well as 10    establishing a school counseling advisory council that 11    includes representatives of key stakeholders selected to 12    review and advise on the implementation of the school 13    counseling program;14        (34) acting as a liaison between the public schools 15    and community resources and building relationships with 16    important stakeholders, such as families, administrators, 17    teachers, and board members;18        (35) maintaining organized, clear, and useful records 19    in a confidential manner consistent with Section 5 of the 20    Illinois School Student Records Act, the Family 21    Educational Rights and Privacy Act, and the Health 22    Insurance Portability and Accountability Act;23        (36) presenting an annual agreement to the 24    administration, including a formal discussion of the 25    alignment of school and school counseling program missions 26    and goals and detailing specific school counselor   HB4926- 6 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    responsibilities;2        (37) identifying and implementing culturally sensitive 3    measures of success for student competencies in each of 4    the 3 domains of academic, social and emotional, and 5    college and career learning based on planned and periodic 6    assessment of the comprehensive developmental school 7    counseling program;8        (38) collaborating as a team member in Multi-Tiered 9    Systems of Support and other school initiatives;10        (39) conducting observations and participating in 11    recommendations or interventions regarding the placement 12    of children in educational programs or special education 13    classes;14        (40) analyzing data and results of school counseling 15    program assessments, including curriculum, small-group, 16    and closing-the-gap results reports, and designing 17    strategies to continue to improve program effectiveness;18        (41) analyzing data and results of school counselor 19    competency assessments;20        (42) following American School Counselor Association 21    Ethical Standards for School Counselors to demonstrate 22    high standards of integrity, leadership, and 23    professionalism;24        (43) using student competencies to assess student 25    growth and development to inform decisions regarding 26    strategies, activities, and services that help students   HB4926- 7 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    achieve the highest academic level possible;2        (44) practicing as a culturally skilled school 3    counselor by infusing the multicultural competencies 4    within the role of the school counselor, including the 5    practice of culturally sensitive attitudes and beliefs, 6    knowledge, and skills;7        (45) infusing the Social-Emotional Standards, as 8    presented in the State Board of Education standards, 9    across the curriculum and in the counselor's role in ways 10    that empower and enable students to achieve academic 11    success across all grade levels;12        (46) providing services only in areas in which the 13    school counselor has appropriate training or expertise, as 14    well as only providing counseling or consulting services 15    within his or her employment to any student in the 16    district or districts which employ such school counselor, 17    in accordance with professional ethics;18        (47) having adequate training in supervision knowledge 19    and skills in order to supervise school counseling interns 20    enrolled in graduate school counselor preparation programs 21    that meet the standards established by the State Board of 22    Education;23        (48) being involved with State and national 24    professional associations;25        (49) complete the required training as outlined in 26    Section 10-22.39;  HB4926- 8 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1        (50) (blank);2        (51) (blank);3        (52) (blank);4        (53) (blank); 5        (54) (blank); and6        (55) promoting career and technical education by 7    assisting each student to determine an appropriate 8    postsecondary plan based upon the student's skills, 9    strengths, and goals and assisting the student to 10    implement the best practices that improve career or 11    workforce readiness after high school. 12    School districts shall may employ a sufficient number of 13school counselors to maintain a the national and State 14recommended student-counselor ratio of 150 250 to 1. School 15districts may have school counselors spend at least 80% of 16their his or her work time in direct contact with students.17    Nothing in this Section prohibits other qualified 18professionals, including other endorsed school support 19personnel, from providing the services listed in this Section.20(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-542, eff. 7-1-24 (see 21Section 905 of P.A. 103-563 for effective date of P.A. 22103-542; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24; 104-353, eff. 8-15-25; 104-417, 23eff. 8-15-25.) 24    (105 ILCS 5/34-18)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-18)25    Sec. 34-18. Powers of the board. The board shall exercise   HB4926- 9 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1general supervision and jurisdiction over the public education 2and the public school system of the city, and, except as 3otherwise provided by this Article, shall have power:4        1. To make suitable provision for the establishment 5    and maintenance throughout the year or for such portion 6    thereof as it may direct, not less than 9 months and in 7    compliance with Section 10-19.05, of schools of all grades 8    and kinds, including normal schools, high schools, night 9    schools, schools for defectives and delinquents, parental 10    and truant schools, schools for the blind, the deaf, and 11    persons with physical disabilities, schools or classes in 12    manual training, constructural and vocational teaching, 13    domestic arts, and physical culture, vocation and 14    extension schools and lecture courses, and all other 15    educational courses and facilities, including 16    establishing, equipping, maintaining and operating 17    playgrounds and recreational programs, when such programs 18    are conducted in, adjacent to, or connected with any 19    public school under the general supervision and 20    jurisdiction of the board; provided that the calendar for 21    the school term and any changes must be submitted to and 22    approved by the State Board of Education before the 23    calendar or changes may take effect, and provided that in 24    allocating funds from year to year for the operation of 25    all attendance centers within the district, the board 26    shall ensure that supplemental general State aid or   HB4926- 10 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    supplemental grant funds are allocated and applied in 2    accordance with Section 18-8, 18-8.05, or 18-8.15. To 3    admit to such schools without charge foreign exchange 4    students who are participants in an organized exchange 5    student program which is authorized by the board. The 6    board shall permit all students to enroll in 7    apprenticeship programs in trade schools operated by the 8    board, whether those programs are union-sponsored or not. 9    No student shall be refused admission into or be excluded 10    from any course of instruction offered in the common 11    schools by reason of that student's sex. No student shall 12    be denied equal access to physical education and 13    interscholastic athletic programs supported from school 14    district funds or denied participation in comparable 15    physical education and athletic programs solely by reason 16    of the student's sex. Equal access to programs supported 17    from school district funds and comparable programs will be 18    defined in rules promulgated by the State Board of 19    Education in consultation with the Illinois High School 20    Association. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 21    Article, neither the board of education nor any local 22    school council or other school official shall recommend 23    that children with disabilities be placed into regular 24    education classrooms unless those children with 25    disabilities are provided with supplementary services to 26    assist them so that they benefit from the regular   HB4926- 11 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    classroom instruction and are included on the teacher's 2    regular education class register;3        2. To furnish lunches to pupils, to make a reasonable 4    charge therefor, and to use school funds for the payment 5    of such expenses as the board may determine are necessary 6    in conducting the school lunch program;7        3. To co-operate with the circuit court;8        4. To make arrangements with the public or 9    quasi-public libraries and museums for the use of their 10    facilities by teachers and pupils of the public schools;11        5. To employ dentists and prescribe their duties for 12    the purpose of treating the pupils in the schools, but 13    accepting such treatment shall be optional with parents or 14    guardians;15        6. To grant the use of assembly halls and classrooms 16    when not otherwise needed, including light, heat, and 17    attendants, for free public lectures, concerts, and other 18    educational and social interests, free of charge, under 19    such provisions and control as the principal of the 20    affected attendance center may prescribe;21        7. To apportion the pupils to the several schools; 22    provided that no pupil shall be excluded from or 23    segregated in any such school on account of his color, 24    race, sex, or nationality. The board shall take into 25    consideration the prevention of segregation and the 26    elimination of separation of children in public schools   HB4926- 12 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    because of color, race, sex, or nationality. Except that 2    children may be committed to or attend parental and social 3    adjustment schools established and maintained either for 4    boys or girls only. All records pertaining to the 5    creation, alteration or revision of attendance areas shall 6    be open to the public. Nothing herein shall limit the 7    board's authority to establish multi-area attendance 8    centers or other student assignment systems for 9    desegregation purposes or otherwise, and to apportion the 10    pupils to the several schools. Furthermore, beginning in 11    school year 1994-95, pursuant to a board plan adopted by 12    October 1, 1993, the board shall offer, commencing on a 13    phased-in basis, the opportunity for families within the 14    school district to apply for enrollment of their children 15    in any attendance center within the school district which 16    does not have selective admission requirements approved by 17    the board. The appropriate geographical area in which such 18    open enrollment may be exercised shall be determined by 19    the board of education. Such children may be admitted to 20    any such attendance center on a space available basis 21    after all children residing within such attendance 22    center's area have been accommodated. If the number of 23    applicants from outside the attendance area exceed the 24    space available, then successful applicants shall be 25    selected by lottery. The board of education's open 26    enrollment plan must include provisions that allow   HB4926- 13 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    low-income students to have access to transportation 2    needed to exercise school choice. Open enrollment shall be 3    in compliance with the provisions of the Consent Decree 4    and Desegregation Plan cited in Section 34-1.01;5        8. To approve programs and policies for providing 6    transportation services to students. Nothing herein shall 7    be construed to permit or empower the State Board of 8    Education to order, mandate, or require busing or other 9    transportation of pupils for the purpose of achieving 10    racial balance in any school;11        9. Subject to the limitations in this Article, to 12    establish and approve system-wide curriculum objectives 13    and standards, including graduation standards, which 14    reflect the multi-cultural diversity in the city and are 15    consistent with State law, provided that for all purposes 16    of this Article courses or proficiency in American Sign 17    Language shall be deemed to constitute courses or 18    proficiency in a foreign language; and to employ 19    principals and teachers, appointed as provided in this 20    Article, and fix their compensation. The board shall 21    prepare such reports related to minimal competency testing 22    as may be requested by the State Board of Education and, in 23    addition, shall monitor and approve special education and 24    bilingual education programs and policies within the 25    district to ensure that appropriate services are provided 26    in accordance with applicable State and federal laws to   HB4926- 14 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    children requiring services and education in those areas;2        10. To employ non-teaching personnel or utilize 3    volunteer personnel for: (i) non-teaching duties not 4    requiring instructional judgment or evaluation of pupils, 5    including library duties; and (ii) supervising study 6    halls, long distance teaching reception areas used 7    incident to instructional programs transmitted by 8    electronic media such as computers, video, and audio, 9    detention and discipline areas, and school-sponsored 10    extracurricular activities. The board may further utilize 11    volunteer nonlicensed personnel or employ nonlicensed 12    personnel to assist in the instruction of pupils under the 13    immediate supervision of a teacher holding a valid 14    educator license, directly engaged in teaching subject 15    matter or conducting activities; provided that the teacher 16    shall be continuously aware of the nonlicensed persons' 17    activities and shall be able to control or modify them. 18    The general superintendent shall determine qualifications 19    of such personnel and shall prescribe rules for 20    determining the duties and activities to be assigned to 21    such personnel;22        10.5. To utilize volunteer personnel from a regional 23    School Crisis Assistance Team (S.C.A.T.), created as part 24    of the Safe to Learn Program established pursuant to 25    Section 25 of the Illinois Violence Prevention Act of 26    1995, to provide assistance to schools in times of   HB4926- 15 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    violence or other traumatic incidents within a school 2    community by providing crisis intervention services to 3    lessen the effects of emotional trauma on individuals and 4    the community; the School Crisis Assistance Team Steering 5    Committee shall determine the qualifications for 6    volunteers;7        11. To provide television studio facilities in not to 8    exceed one school building and to provide programs for 9    educational purposes, provided, however, that the board 10    shall not construct, acquire, operate, or maintain a 11    television transmitter; to grant the use of its studio 12    facilities to a licensed television station located in the 13    school district; and to maintain and operate not to exceed 14    one school radio transmitting station and provide programs 15    for educational purposes;16        12. To offer, if deemed appropriate, outdoor education 17    courses, including field trips within the State of 18    Illinois, or adjacent states, and to use school 19    educational funds for the expense of the said outdoor 20    educational programs, whether within the school district 21    or not;22        13. During that period of the calendar year not 23    embraced within the regular school term, to provide and 24    conduct courses in subject matters normally embraced in 25    the program of the schools during the regular school term 26    and to give regular school credit for satisfactory   HB4926- 16 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    completion by the student of such courses as may be 2    approved for credit by the State Board of Education;3        14. To insure against any loss or liability of the 4    board, the former School Board Nominating Commission, 5    Local School Councils, the Chicago Schools Academic 6    Accountability Council, or the former Subdistrict Councils 7    or of any member, officer, agent, or employee thereof, 8    resulting from alleged violations of civil rights arising 9    from incidents occurring on or after September 5, 1967 or 10    from the wrongful or negligent act or omission of any such 11    person whether occurring within or without the school 12    premises, provided the officer, agent, or employee was, at 13    the time of the alleged violation of civil rights or 14    wrongful act or omission, acting within the scope of his 15    or her employment or under direction of the board, the 16    former School Board Nominating Commission, the Chicago 17    Schools Academic Accountability Council, Local School 18    Councils, or the former Subdistrict Councils; and to 19    provide for or participate in insurance plans for its 20    officers and employees, including, but not limited to, 21    retirement annuities, medical, surgical and 22    hospitalization benefits in such types and amounts as may 23    be determined by the board; provided, however, that the 24    board shall contract for such insurance only with an 25    insurance company authorized to do business in this State. 26    Such insurance may include provision for employees who   HB4926- 17 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    rely on treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone for 2    healing, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a 3    recognized religious denomination;4        15. To contract with the corporate authorities of any 5    municipality or the county board of any county, as the 6    case may be, to provide for the regulation of traffic in 7    parking areas of property used for school purposes, in 8    such manner as is provided by Section 11-209 of the 9    Illinois Vehicle Code;10        16. In this paragraph 16:11        "Direct admissions information" means a student's 12    name, home address, birth date, telephone number, email 13    address, cumulative grade point average, and high school. 14        "Directory information" means a high school student's 15    name, home address, birth date, and telephone number.16        "Public institution of higher education" has the 17    meaning given to that term in the Board of Higher 18    Education Act. 19        (a) To provide, on an equal basis and consistent with 20    the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 21    1974 and the Illinois School Student Records Act, access 22    to a high school campus and student directory information 23    to the official recruiting representatives of the armed 24    forces of Illinois and the United States, to the Illinois 25    Student Assistance Commission, and to public institutions 26    of higher education for the purposes of informing students   HB4926- 18 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    of educational and career opportunities if the board has 2    provided such access to persons or groups whose purpose is 3    to acquaint students with educational or occupational 4    opportunities available to them. The board is not required 5    to give greater notice regarding the right of access to 6    recruiting representatives than is given to other persons 7    and groups.8        (a-5) To provide, on an equal basis and consistent 9    with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 10    of 1974 and the Illinois School Student Records Act, 11    access to student direct admissions information to the 12    Illinois Student Assistance Commission for the purpose of 13    the direct admission program. 14        (b) If a student or his or her parent or guardian 15    submits a signed, written request to the high school 16    before the end of the student's sophomore year (or if the 17    student is a transfer student, by another time set by the 18    high school) that indicates that the student or his or her 19    parent or guardian does not want the student's directory 20    information to be provided to official recruiting 21    representatives, to the Illinois Student Assistance 22    Commission, and to public institutions of higher education 23    under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph 16, the high 24    school may not provide access to the student's directory 25    information to these recruiting representatives, the 26    Illinois Student Assistance Commission, and public   HB4926- 19 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    institutions of higher education. The high school shall 2    notify its students and their parents or guardians of the 3    provisions of this subparagraph (b).4        (b-5) If a student who is 18 years of age or older or 5    the parent or guardian of a student under 18 years of age 6    submits a signed, written or electronic consent that 7    indicates that the student or his or her parent or 8    guardian does permit the student's direct admissions 9    information to be provided, the high school shall provide 10    the student's direct admissions information to the 11    Illinois Student Assistance Commission.12        The Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall 13    provide template opt-in language to those school districts 14    maintaining grades 10 through 12, which shall be made 15    available on the Commission's website no later than June 16    30, 2025. The template opt-in language shall specify that 17    if the student or the student's parent or guardian 18    provides consent, the student's direct admissions 19    information will be sent to the Illinois Student 20    Assistance Commission and the direct admissions 21    information may, as needed for the administration of the 22    direct admission program under the Public University 23    Direct Admission Program Act, be redisclosed to the Board 24    of Higher Education, the Illinois Community College Board, 25    public universities for which the student qualifies under 26    the direct admission program, the University of Illinois   HB4926- 20 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    at Urbana-Champaign and the University of Illinois at 2    Chicago if the student qualifies under Section 20 of the 3    Public University Direct Admission Program Act, the 4    community college district where the student resides, and, 5    if applicable, a third party that operates a statewide 6    student application portal. The template opt-in language 7    shall also specify that direct admissions information may 8    not be redisclosed to any other individual or entity 9    unless the opt-in language notifies the student or the 10    student's parent or guardian of such redisclosure and the 11    student or the student's parent or guardian consents to 12    the redisclosure. 13        The high school shall notify its students and their 14    parents or guardians of the provisions of this 15    subparagraph (b-5) and, at the time of school registration 16    or at other appropriate times prior to the end of a 17    student's junior year, give its students and their parents 18    or guardians the option for the student information to be 19    shared for the purpose of the direct admission program. 20        (c) A high school may require official recruiting 21    representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the 22    United States to pay a fee for copying and mailing a 23    student's directory information in an amount that is not 24    more than the actual costs incurred by the high school.25        (d) Information received by an official under this 26    Section may be used only to provide information to   HB4926- 21 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    students concerning educational and career opportunities. 2    Information may not be released to a person who is not 3    involved in recruiting students for the armed forces of 4    Illinois or the United States or providing educational 5    opportunity information for the Board of Higher Education, 6    the Illinois Community College Board, the Illinois Student 7    Assistance Commission, or public institutions of higher 8    education.9        (e) By July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, the 10    school district shall make student directory information 11    electronically accessible for official recruiting 12    representatives of the armed forces of Illinois or the 13    United States, to the Illinois Student Assistance 14    Commission, and to public institutions of higher 15    education;16        (f) By July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, the 17    school district shall make student direct admissions 18    information electronically accessible through a secure, 19    centralized data system to the Illinois Student Assistance 20    Commission for the purpose of the direct admission 21    program. 22        (g) The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois 23    Community College Board, the Illinois Student Assistance 24    Commission, and the State Board of Education may adopt any 25    rules necessary to administer this paragraph 16. 26        17. (a) To sell or market any computer program   HB4926- 22 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    developed by an employee of the school district, provided 2    that such employee developed the computer program as a 3    direct result of his or her duties with the school 4    district or through the utilization of school district 5    resources or facilities. The employee who developed the 6    computer program shall be entitled to share in the 7    proceeds of such sale or marketing of the computer 8    program. The distribution of such proceeds between the 9    employee and the school district shall be as agreed upon 10    by the employee and the school district, except that 11    neither the employee nor the school district may receive 12    more than 90% of such proceeds. The negotiation for an 13    employee who is represented by an exclusive bargaining 14    representative may be conducted by such bargaining 15    representative at the employee's request.16        (b) For the purpose of this paragraph 17:17        (1) "Computer" means an internally programmed, general 18    purpose digital device capable of automatically accepting 19    data, processing data and supplying the results of the 20    operation.21        (2) "Computer program" means a series of coded 22    instructions or statements in a form acceptable to a 23    computer, which causes the computer to process data in 24    order to achieve a certain result.25        (3) "Proceeds" means profits derived from the 26    marketing or sale of a product after deducting the   HB4926- 23 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    expenses of developing and marketing such product;2        18. To delegate to the general superintendent of 3    schools, by resolution, the authority to approve contracts 4    and expenditures in amounts of $35,000 or less;5        19. Upon the written request of an employee, to 6    withhold from the compensation of that employee any dues, 7    payments, or contributions payable by such employee to any 8    labor organization as defined in the Illinois Educational 9    Labor Relations Act. Under such arrangement, an amount 10    shall be withheld from each regular payroll period which 11    is equal to the pro rata share of the annual dues plus any 12    payments or contributions, and the board shall transmit 13    such withholdings to the specified labor organization 14    within 10 working days from the time of the withholding;15        19a. Upon receipt of notice from the comptroller of a 16    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more, a 17    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more, the Cook 18    County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 19    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 20    Chicago Transit Authority, or a housing authority of a 21    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more that a 22    debt is due and owing the municipality, the county, the 23    Cook County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 24    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 25    Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing authority by an 26    employee of the Chicago Board of Education, to withhold,   HB4926- 24 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    from the compensation of that employee, the amount of the 2    debt that is due and owing and pay the amount withheld to 3    the municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest 4    Preserve District, the Chicago Park District, the 5    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the Chicago 6    Transit Authority, or the housing authority; provided, 7    however, that the amount deducted from any one salary or 8    wage payment shall not exceed 25% of the net amount of the 9    payment. Before the Board deducts any amount from any 10    salary or wage of an employee under this paragraph, the 11    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 12    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 13    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority, 14    or the housing authority shall certify that (i) the 15    employee has been afforded an opportunity for a hearing to 16    dispute the debt that is due and owing the municipality, 17    the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the 18    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 19    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 20    authority and (ii) the employee has received notice of a 21    wage deduction order and has been afforded an opportunity 22    for a hearing to object to the order. For purposes of this 23    paragraph, "net amount" means that part of the salary or 24    wage payment remaining after the deduction of any amounts 25    required by law to be deducted and "debt due and owing" 26    means (i) a specified sum of money owed to the   HB4926- 25 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 2    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 3    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority, 4    or the housing authority for services, work, or goods, 5    after the period granted for payment has expired, or (ii) 6    a specified sum of money owed to the municipality, the 7    county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the 8    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 9    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 10    authority pursuant to a court order or order of an 11    administrative hearing officer after the exhaustion of, or 12    the failure to exhaust, judicial review;13        20. (Blank); The board is encouraged to employ a 14    sufficient number of licensed school counselors to 15    maintain a student/counselor ratio of 250 to 1. Each 16    counselor shall spend at least 75% of his work time in 17    direct contact with students and shall maintain a record 18    of such time;19        21. To make available to students vocational and 20    career counseling and to establish 5 special career 21    counseling days for students and parents. On these days 22    representatives of local businesses and industries shall 23    be invited to the school campus and shall inform students 24    of career opportunities available to them in the various 25    businesses and industries. Special consideration shall be 26    given to counseling minority students as to career   HB4926- 26 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    opportunities available to them in various fields. For the 2    purposes of this paragraph, minority student means a 3    person who is any of the following:4        (a) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 5    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 6    America, including Central America, and who maintains 7    tribal affiliation or community attachment).8        (b) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 9    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 10    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 11    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan, 12    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam).13        (c) Black or African American (a person having origins 14    in any of the black racial groups of Africa).15        (d) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican, 16    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 17    culture or origin, regardless of race).18        (e) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 19    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 20    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands).21        Counseling days shall not be in lieu of regular school 22    days;23        22. To report to the State Board of Education the 24    annual student dropout rate and number of students who 25    graduate from, transfer from, or otherwise leave bilingual 26    programs;  HB4926- 27 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1        23. Except as otherwise provided in the Abused and 2    Neglected Child Reporting Act or other applicable State or 3    federal law, to permit school officials to withhold, from 4    any person, information on the whereabouts of any child 5    removed from school premises when the child has been taken 6    into protective custody as a victim of suspected child 7    abuse. School officials shall direct such person to the 8    Department of Children and Family Services or to the local 9    law enforcement agency, if appropriate;10        24. To develop a policy, based on the current state of 11    existing school facilities, projected enrollment, and 12    efficient utilization of available resources, for capital 13    improvement of schools and school buildings within the 14    district, addressing in that policy both the relative 15    priority for major repairs, renovations, and additions to 16    school facilities and the advisability or necessity of 17    building new school facilities or closing existing schools 18    to meet current or projected demographic patterns within 19    the district;20        25. To make available to the students in every high 21    school attendance center the ability to take all courses 22    necessary to comply with the Board of Higher Education's 23    college entrance criteria effective in 1993;24        26. To encourage mid-career changes into the teaching 25    profession, whereby qualified professionals become 26    licensed teachers, by allowing credit for professional   HB4926- 28 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    employment in related fields when determining point of 2    entry on the teacher pay scale;3        27. To provide or contract out training programs for 4    administrative personnel and principals with revised or 5    expanded duties pursuant to this Code in order to ensure 6    they have the knowledge and skills to perform their 7    duties;8        28. To establish a fund for the prioritized special 9    needs programs, and to allocate such funds and other lump 10    sum amounts to each attendance center in a manner 11    consistent with the provisions of part 4 of Section 12    34-2.3. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 13    require any additional appropriations of State funds for 14    this purpose;15        29. (Blank);16        30. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or 17    any other law to the contrary, to contract with third 18    parties for services otherwise performed by employees, 19    including those in a bargaining unit, and to lay off those 20    employees upon 14 days' written notice to the affected 21    employees. Those contracts may be for a period not to 22    exceed 5 years and may be awarded on a system-wide basis. 23    The board may not operate more than 30 contract schools, 24    provided that the board may operate an additional 5 25    contract turnaround schools pursuant to item (5.5) of 26    subsection (d) of Section 34-8.3 of this Code, and the   HB4926- 29 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1    governing bodies of contract schools are subject to the 2    Freedom of Information Act and Open Meetings Act;3        31. To promulgate rules establishing procedures 4    governing the layoff or reduction in force of employees 5    and the recall of such employees, including, but not 6    limited to, criteria for such layoffs, reductions in force 7    or recall rights of such employees and the weight to be 8    given to any particular criterion. Such criteria shall 9    take into account factors, including, but not limited to, 10    qualifications, certifications, experience, performance 11    ratings or evaluations, and any other factors relating to 12    an employee's job performance;13        32. To develop a policy to prevent nepotism in the 14    hiring of personnel or the selection of contractors;15        33. (Blank); and16        34. To establish a Labor Management Council to the 17    board comprised of representatives of the board, the chief 18    executive officer, and those labor organizations that are 19    the exclusive representatives of employees of the board 20    and to promulgate policies and procedures for the 21    operation of the Council.22    The specifications of the powers herein granted are not to 23be construed as exclusive, but the board shall also exercise 24all other powers that may be requisite or proper for the 25maintenance and the development of a public school system, not 26inconsistent with the other provisions of this Article or   HB4926- 30 -LRB104 16706 LNS 30111 b1provisions of this Code which apply to all school districts.2    In addition to the powers herein granted and authorized to 3be exercised by the board, it shall be the duty of the board to 4review or to direct independent reviews of special education 5expenditures and services. The board shall file a report of 6such review with the General Assembly on or before May 1, 1990.7(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 104-15, eff. 6-30-25; 8104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 9    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)10    Sec. 34-18.88. School counselors. The board shall employ a 11sufficient number of licensed school counselors to maintain a 12student-counselor ratio of 100 to 1. Each counselor shall 13spend at least 75% of his or her work time in direct contact 14with students and shall maintain a record of such time.